src/lexica/__backup__/n.lexc
!!!n.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Indf +Poss +1P +2P +3P

LEXICON Root
NPrefix;
N;

LEXICON NPrefix
!Inferred
+N:آ^ N;
+N:ا^ N;
+N:بر^ N;

LEXICON NInf
+N+Sg:0 #;
!Plurals
+N+Pl:~ها #; !Form with ZWNJ
+N+Pl:^ها #; !Form with no separator
+N+Pl:^ان #;
+N+Pl:^ت #;
+N+Pl:^ین #;
!Indefinite marker
+N+Indf:^ی #;
!Pronominal enclitics
+N+Poss+1P+Sg:^م #;
+N+Poss+2P+Sg:^ت #;
+N+Poss+3P+Sg:^ش #;
+N+Poss+1P+Pl:^مان #;
+N+Poss+2P+Pl:^تان #;
+N+Poss+3P+Pl:^شان #;
!Inferred
+N:^وط #;
+N:^یم #;
+N:^جات #;
+N:^ینش #;
+N:^ا #;
+N:^اتمان #;
+N:^ینت #;
+N:^ام #;
+N:^ینتان #;
+N:^ی‌هایی #;
+N:^ار #;
+N:^اش #;
+N:^ات #;
+N:^اد #;
+N:^ایی #;
+N:^اء #;
+N:^هایشان #;
+N:^هایی #;
+N:^وقی #;
+N:^چه #;
+N:^یی‌شان #;
+N:^تر #;
+N:^ند #;
+N:^اتتان #;
+N:^ارتان #;
+N:^ی‌های #;
+N:^ک #;
+N:^ییتر #;
+N:^اتم #;
+N:^یت #;
+N:^ید #;
+N:^اتش #;
+N:^ه #;
+N:^ترها #;
+N:^اری #;
+N:^یش #;
+N:^اتی #;
+N:^های #;
+N:^ترین #;
+N:^ی‌ها #;
+N:^اتشان #;
+N:^وات #;
+N:^وص #;
+N:^یشان #;
+N:^هاشان #;
+N:^جمهور #;
+N:^اتت #;
+N:^ود #;
+N:^ﯾﺶ #;
+N:^یانی #;
+N:^انم #;
+N:^یی #;
+N:^یات #;
+N:^یتان #;
+N:^انتان #;
+N:^ی‌ام #;
+N:^یان #;
+N:^ی‌هایتان #;
+N:^می #;
+N:^هایت #;
+N:^ادشان #;
+N:^ترشان #;
+N:^یی‌ها #;
+N:^جاتی #;
+N:^هایش #;
+N:^انمان #;
+N:^انی #;
+N:^هایتان #;
+N:^انشان #;
+N:^یانم #;
+N:^یانتان #;
+N:^یمان #;
+N:^ی‌هایمان #;
+N:^اید #;
+N:^یانت #;
+N:^ی‌اش #;
+N:^ای #;
+N:^ادی #;
+N:^انت #;
+N:^انش #;
+N:^یی‌های #;
+N:^ینی #;
+N:^ایم #;
+N:^ی‌ات #;
+N:^یانش #;
+N:^هایمان #;
+N:^ودی #;
+N:^کان #;
+N:^ون #;
+N:^وف #;
+N:^وق #;
+N:^هایم #;

LEXICON N
نهصد	NInf;
جم	NInf;
ترانه	NInf;
معبد	NInf;
زابل	NInf;
رگ	NInf;
حضرت	NInf;
مایل	NInf;
کراوات	NInf;
ایزد	NInf;
براد	NInf;
تلاقی	NInf;
روغن	NInf;
لوتر	NInf;
کرانه	NInf;
اپراتوری	NInf;
ریختن	NInf;
سعودی	NInf;
همکار	NInf;
جویا	NInf;
جشن	NInf;
ظریف	NInf;
سوئیس	NInf;
خرمدره	NInf;
کدگذاری	NInf;
واژه	NInf;
وقت	NInf;
باباجی	NInf;
مغازه‌دار	NInf;
گرگر	NInf;
شامپو	NInf;
شاندیز	NInf;
روشنفکر	NInf;
مهمیز	NInf;
وطن	NInf;
تحجر	NInf;
بسته‌بندی	NInf;
تخس	NInf;
زیبافر	NInf;
SD	NInf;
مقادیر	NInf;
تره‌بار	NInf;
دشت	NInf;
سیوند	NInf;
عالم	NInf;
کنسرت	NInf;
گرفته	NInf;
دندان	NInf;
مخترع	NInf;
اصول‌گرا	NInf;
مارتین	NInf;
لیندسی	NInf;
پیمانه	NInf;
عجایب	NInf;
چهارراه	NInf;
مطلب	NInf;
عتیقه	NInf;
فهرست	NInf;
افتخار	NInf;
نیرو	NInf;
اعتنا	NInf;
دین	NInf;
دردسر	NInf;
نی‌ریزی	NInf;
مغ	NInf;
انگلس	NInf;
حراجی	NInf;
پست	NInf;
خاورمیانه	NInf;
جا	NInf;
ظاهرشاه	NInf;
ممیز	NInf;
مؤتمن‌الملک	NInf;
فربنکس	NInf;
جو	NInf;
مدعا	NInf;
کهک	NInf;
عاشقانه	NInf;
شرف	NInf;
بزی	NInf;
رسانا	NInf;
هویج	NInf;
سمفونی	NInf;
شیهه	NInf;
رویال	NInf;
قرض	NInf;
سیر	NInf;
طلعت	NInf;
سیلندر	NInf;
ترال	NInf;
ویرایشگر	NInf;
کامل	NInf;
حیا	NInf;
مسیح	NInf;
پیشواز	NInf;
لیزردرمانی	NInf;
خبر	NInf;
کوزوو	NInf;
درون	NInf;
علیشاهی	NInf;
ماست	NInf;
قورباغه	NInf;
لحظه	NInf;
کپی‌برداری	NInf;
سالاری	NInf;
فیلمنامه	NInf;
ماشین	NInf;
میت	NInf;
قارچ	NInf;
رفتار	NInf;
راهبرد	NInf;
مجموعه	NInf;
تفسیر	NInf;
بیگلر	NInf;
شیوع	NInf;
ادبستان	NInf;
حاتمی	NInf;
کمپرسی	NInf;
رشوت	NInf;
باند	NInf;
فعال	NInf;
کتولی	NInf;
زنگ	NInf;
سازمان‌دهی	NInf;
هنگام	NInf;
پیمنتا	NInf;
انسانی	NInf;
سرحلقه	NInf;
زیبا	NInf;
علویه	NInf;
صاحبخانه	NInf;
30	NInf;
آتش‌زنه	NInf;
اضلال	NInf;
مرادآباد	NInf;
رومی	NInf;
بروجن	NInf;
راه‌ساز	NInf;
غم	NInf;
صلوات	NInf;
سرسلسله	NInf;
فیگور	NInf;
کته	NInf;
بازنده	NInf;
گلریزان	NInf;
غربی	NInf;
شست‌وشو	NInf;
موشک	NInf;
ستوه	NInf;
طالب	NInf;
پرسش‌نامه	NInf;
خرقانی	NInf;
مهمانی	NInf;
کارگزینی	NInf;
بی‌تفاوتی	NInf;
دنیاپرست	NInf;
لیفتراک	NInf;
کارتن‌خواب	NInf;
علی‌اکبری	NInf;
معماری	NInf;
سرمایه‌دار	NInf;
دینار	NInf;
چیپس	NInf;
خفه	NInf;
روف	NInf;
زندگی‌دوستی	NInf;
طلبکاری	NInf;
عایشه	NInf;
ناشناختی	NInf;
چتر	NInf;
آرژانتین	NInf;
اروپا	NInf;
ته	NInf;
نبرد	NInf;
شکارگاه	NInf;
یخچال	NInf;
درختچه	NInf;
موج	NInf;
خزی	NInf;
حرامی	NInf;
اهانت‌کنندگان	NInf;
پان‌ترکیسم	NInf;
کوردل	NInf;
شجاعی	NInf;
مدافع	NInf;
طفلکی	NInf;
باراندازی	NInf;
وقار	NInf;
ملتقا	NInf;
الفبا	NInf;
صبا	NInf;
بالگرد	NInf;
کوچ	NInf;
الغدیر	NInf;
مشاعره	NInf;
نپرسیدن	NInf;
سزا	NInf;
آلایش	NInf;
بن	NInf;
آمانو	NInf;
زید	NInf;
قالب‌بندی	NInf;
قدمت	NInf;
رزاقی	NInf;
غافل	NInf;
یهودا	NInf;
تابستان	NInf;
مکر	NInf;
ترازنامه	NInf;
متملق	NInf;
سوئدی	NInf;
بت‌پرست	NInf;
تخمین	NInf;
Movie	NInf;
شعف	NInf;
سناریو	NInf;
اینکه	NInf;
نیوکاسل	NInf;
بازور	NInf;
مارک	NInf;
کاشف	NInf;
شاب	NInf;
غزلواره	NInf;
اشغال	NInf;
موبد	NInf;
خرت	NInf;
ترومپت	NInf;
اطلاع‌یابی	NInf;
اقبالی	NInf;
شوخی	NInf;
مرسداریو	NInf;
داستان	NInf;
جمله‌سازی	NInf;
جایزه	NInf;
الکترونیک	NInf;
بستون	NInf;
سکوت	NInf;
ساختمان	NInf;
باغک	NInf;
هوار	NInf;
خودبرتربینی	NInf;
سوخت	NInf;
عنوان	NInf;
برابری	NInf;
یهودی‌ستیزی	NInf;
خبیث	NInf;
همان‌گونه	NInf;
دخترخاله	NInf;
چنبره	NInf;
برید	NInf;
بایزید	NInf;
خال	NInf;
هانیه	NInf;
دریانورد	NInf;
وصی	NInf;
دره‌شیخان	NInf;
تفکر	NInf;
حشمت	NInf;
دولتی	NInf;
گله	NInf;
مارتل	NInf;
گنبدکاووس	NInf;
پراکندگی	NInf;
رزمنده	NInf;
عطار	NInf;
برداشت	NInf;
گناوه	NInf;
۱۸۴۹	NInf;
مدرن	NInf;
Button	NInf;
ناامیدی	NInf;
قبیله‌سالار	NInf;
اجرا	NInf;
ایران	NInf;
عملکرد	NInf;
دربه‌در	NInf;
1974	NInf;
آنجلال	NInf;
هدایت‌الله	NInf;
ترک‌تازی	NInf;
طمع	NInf;
الگو	NInf;
دن	NInf;
مکاتبه	NInf;
مدعی	NInf;
روانکاوی	NInf;
فروشگاه	NInf;
تلمبه	NInf;
فیصله	NInf;
پارتی‌بازی	NInf;
شادکامی	NInf;
گوشمالی	NInf;
دونده	NInf;
کذا	NInf;
چادر	NInf;
تیهو	NInf;
حیف	NInf;
بازاندیشی	NInf;
شماره‌گذاری	NInf;
زینووف	NInf;
وارونگی	NInf;
پفک	NInf;
جنسیت	NInf;
تکم‌چی	NInf;
رمادی	NInf;
هفتاد	NInf;
میزبان	NInf;
تاب‌بازی	NInf;
فرمان‌آرا	NInf;
عارضه	NInf;
بقیه	NInf;
پلو	NInf;
پشتوانه	NInf;
المکلا	NInf;
ترسیم	NInf;
ورتر	NInf;
مریضی	NInf;
برانگیختن	NInf;
کلنی	NInf;
حائر	NInf;
دیده‌بانی	NInf;
نیک‌نام	NInf;
هورمون	NInf;
روناک	NInf;
ماریا	NInf;
شکلات	NInf;
مزخرف	NInf;
دیاز	NInf;
الزمالک	NInf;
تمهید	NInf;
نعمت‌الله	NInf;
ماهیت	NInf;
هائیتی	NInf;
حکیمیه	NInf;
رومل	NInf;
کس	NInf;
هواداری	NInf;
فایل	NInf;
۲۰۰۳	NInf;
مالکیت	NInf;
بوکاجونیورز	NInf;
صدام	NInf;
مارکوف	NInf;
محبین	NInf;
بشکه	NInf;
کالپوش	NInf;
مژدگانی	NInf;
ونوس	NInf;
کلیات	NInf;
قطع	NInf;
سی‌دی	NInf;
خفیه	NInf;
قانونمندی	NInf;
جوسازی	NInf;
کنگر	NInf;
دادخواه	NInf;
تحکیم	NInf;
دادن	NInf;
نقی	NInf;
آبش	NInf;
اشترانی	NInf;
نیروگاه	NInf;
سرنگ	NInf;
آبستنی	NInf;
ولع	NInf;
تغذیه	NInf;
محراب	NInf;
مادربزرگ	NInf;
چک	NInf;
مینیاتور	NInf;
صید	NInf;
پدیده	NInf;
غاز	NInf;
ناکثین	NInf;
اداراه	NInf;
حاشیه‌نشین	NInf;
دادویه	NInf;
دسته‌جمعی	NInf;
ماتریالیسم	NInf;
قضیه	NInf;
مجاورت	NInf;
ساکر	NInf;
ونیز	NInf;
CE	NInf;
شهوت	NInf;
پایان	NInf;
۱۸۲۱	NInf;
1556	NInf;
جاه‌پرست	NInf;
کارنامه	NInf;
ورودی	NInf;
پرخاشگری	NInf;
وضو	NInf;
پردازنده	NInf;
قتلگاه	NInf;
بلاگفا	NInf;
تحول	NInf;
دم‌کلفت	NInf;
دادگستری	NInf;
فاضلاب	NInf;
خسارت	NInf;
آنتن	NInf;
RTL	NInf;
بی‌صداقتی	NInf;
منتشر	NInf;
اسکیت	NInf;
مزاح	NInf;
خواب	NInf;
ماهیانه	NInf;
لباسشویی	NInf;
هرمزی	NInf;
روباه	NInf;
نهانگاه	NInf;
کفن	NInf;
احتساب	NInf;
حاکمیت	NInf;
ترکیدن	NInf;
باب	NInf;
فلس	NInf;
فدائی	NInf;
مهریار	NInf;
خباز	NInf;
مردانی	NInf;
رام‌الله	NInf;
نقلیه	NInf;
نظاره	NInf;
والیبال	NInf;
ابزار	NInf;
Texas	NInf;
علیهما	NInf;
خارک	NInf;
حق‌الناس	NInf;
حاملگی	NInf;
سرو	NInf;
حی	NInf;
طاقچه	NInf;
برف	NInf;
علاوه	NInf;
رذالت	NInf;
زوم	NInf;
سوده	NInf;
1960	NInf;
شیوا	NInf;
خودخواه	NInf;
مجله	NInf;
هزاره	NInf;
معدنچی	NInf;
اسفندیار	NInf;
دارا	NInf;
اوج	NInf;
هجری	NInf;
کلسیم	NInf;
آوانتی	NInf;
سردر	NInf;
عبودیت	NInf;
محبی	NInf;
علی‌محمدی	NInf;
CSS	NInf;
دمتریوس	NInf;
شفاعت	NInf;
فیروزکوه	NInf;
ترمیم	NInf;
غمزه	NInf;
مزون	NInf;
پرهیزگاری	NInf;
طیف‌سنجی	NInf;
زیباشناسی	NInf;
حاجی‌بابایی	NInf;
شاپور	NInf;
رضیه	NInf;
صدیقی	NInf;
اعتقاد	NInf;
نوامبر	NInf;
تناول	NInf;
شبنم	NInf;
وحش	NInf;
رهن	NInf;
خاص	NInf;
محکمه	NInf;
حکمروایی	NInf;
گرگان	NInf;
کاتولیک	NInf;
گردو	NInf;
اویلر	NInf;
تابلو	NInf;
نوبت	NInf;
شهرستانی	NInf;
شهادت	NInf;
شوهر	NInf;
تجربی	NInf;
شاخک	NInf;
چرخ‌کاری	NInf;
مندرجه	NInf;
تریسی	NInf;
پیکار	NInf;
حفار	NInf;
درو	NInf;
اپراتور	NInf;
مدرک	NInf;
پسرکشی	NInf;
سیم‌کارت	NInf;
دریانوردی	NInf;
توتیا	NInf;
رسالت	NInf;
وایتکس	NInf;
کنترل	NInf;
بیمارستان	NInf;
ایگواناها	NInf;
افترا	NInf;
بنیادکار	NInf;
شبستان	NInf;
پیکان	NInf;
فتوا	NInf;
میامی	NInf;
روبنده	NInf;
ایرانمهر	NInf;
زیبایی	NInf;
ملاط	NInf;
سفتی	NInf;
دیوان	NInf;
بریتیش	NInf;
دخان	NInf;
خواهر	NInf;
ریاست	NInf;
منچستر	NInf;
۱۰	NInf;
محافظه‌کار	NInf;
اعوذ	NInf;
انگشت	NInf;
کره	NInf;
حساب	NInf;
1841	NInf;
درشتی	NInf;
پوتین	NInf;
۱۳۷۳	NInf;
رکوردزنی	NInf;
Ram	NInf;
دین‌مداری	NInf;
آلومینیوم	NInf;
خیار	NInf;
طب	NInf;
متهم	NInf;
تشنگی	NInf;
اسماء	NInf;
ژنو	NInf;
کولاک	NInf;
آرجونا	NInf;
دلیر	NInf;
سوفیست	NInf;
جعفی	NInf;
محوری	NInf;
لطفی	NInf;
نیمسال	NInf;
تلخک	NInf;
اختر	NInf;
نیکل	NInf;
تقطیع‌گر	NInf;
طائف	NInf;
آیدین	NInf;
حسینی‌نژاد	NInf;
نام‌نویسی	NInf;
دکور	NInf;
مکلف	NInf;
بطن	NInf;
۱۹۰۸	NInf;
ملکیت	NInf;
عطاالله	NInf;
طیاره	NInf;
خوف	NInf;
خیسی	NInf;
رجل	NInf;
دیانا	NInf;
تجربه‌محوری	NInf;
2003	NInf;
دستاورد	NInf;
رمز	NInf;
خطاب	NInf;
پوستر	NInf;
ارنی	NInf;
رحل	NInf;
ابر	NInf;
کارلو	NInf;
پایک	NInf;
گرفتارشده	NInf;
